st.aff
FLAG long
SFX pA Y 45
SFX pA ouvoir ouvoir/ pouvoir # po:infi
SFX pA ouvoir ouvant/ pouvoir # po:ppre
SFX pA ouvoir u/ pouvoir # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX pA ouvoir eux/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir uis/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:1sg
SFX pA ouvoir eut/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ouvons/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ouvez/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir euvent/ pouvoir # po:ipre po:3pl!
SFX pA ouvoir ouvais/ pouvoir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir ouvait/ pouvoir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ouvions/ pouvoir # po:iimp po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ouviez/ pouvoir # po:iimp po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir ouvaient/ pouvoir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pA ouvoir us/ pouvoir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir ut/ pouvoir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ûmes/ pouvoir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ûtes/ pouvoir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir urent/ pouvoir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pA ouvoir ourrai/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pA ouvoir ourras/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir ourra/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ourrons/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ourrez/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir ourront/ pouvoir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pA ouvoir ourrais/ pouvoir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir ourrait/ pouvoir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ourrions/ pouvoir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ourriez/ pouvoir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir ourraient/ pouvoir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX pA ouvoir uisse/ pouvoir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir uissé/ pouvoir # po:spre po:1isg
SFX pA ouvoir uissè/ pouvoir # po:spre po:1isg
SFX pA ouvoir uisses/ pouvoir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir uissions/ pouvoir # po:spre po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir uissiez/ pouvoir # po:spre po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir uissent/ pouvoir # po:spre po:3pl
SFX pA ouvoir usse/ pouvoir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX pA ouvoir ussé/ pouvoir # po:simp po:1isg
SFX pA ouvoir ussè/ pouvoir # po:simp po:1isg
SFX pA ouvoir usses/ pouvoir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX pA ouvoir ût/ pouvoir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX pA ouvoir ussions/ pouvoir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX pA ouvoir ussiez/ pouvoir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX pA ouvoir ussent/ pouvoir # po:simp po:3pl

SFX pB Y 49
SFX pB ouloir ouloir/ vouloir # po:infi
SFX pB ouloir oulant/ vouloir # po:ppre
SFX pB ouloir oulu/ vouloir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pB ouloir oulus/ vouloir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pB ouloir oulue/ vouloir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pB ouloir oulues/ vouloir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pB ouloir eux/ vouloir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir eut/ vouloir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulons/ vouloir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulez/ vouloir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir eulent/ vouloir # po:ipre po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oulais/ vouloir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulait/ vouloir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulions/ vouloir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir ouliez/ vouloir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulaient/ vouloir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir oulus/ vouloir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulut/ vouloir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulûmes/ vouloir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulûtes/ vouloir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulurent/ vouloir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oudrai/ vouloir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pB ouloir oudras/ vouloir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oudra/ vouloir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrons/ vouloir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oudrez/ vouloir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oudront/ vouloir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oudrais/ vouloir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrait/ vouloir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrions/ vouloir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oudriez/ vouloir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oudraient/ vouloir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir euille/ vouloir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir euillé/ vouloir # po:spre po:1isg
SFX pB ouloir euillè/ vouloir # po:spre po:1isg
SFX pB ouloir euilles/ vouloir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir euillent/ vouloir # po:spre po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir oulusse/ vouloir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX pB ouloir oulusses/ vouloir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulût/ vouloir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulussions/ vouloir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulussiez/ vouloir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulussent/ vouloir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir euille/ vouloir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir eux/ vouloir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir euillons/ vouloir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulons/ vouloir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir euillez/ vouloir # po:impe po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulez/ vouloir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX pC Y 46
SFX pC evoir evoir/ devoir # po:infi
SFX pC evoir evant/ devoir # po:ppre
SFX pC evoir û/ redevoir # po:ppas po:adj is:epi is:inv
SFX pC evoir u/ redevoir # po:ppas po:adj is:epi is:inv
SFX pC evoir us/ devoir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pC evoir ue/ devoir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pC evoir ues/ devoir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pC evoir ois/ devoir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir oit/ devoir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evons/ devoir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evez/ devoir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pC evoir oivent/ devoir # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pC evoir evais/ devoir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evait/ devoir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evions/ devoir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pC evoir eviez/ devoir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evaient/ devoir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pC evoir us/ devoir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir ut/ devoir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pC evoir ûmes/ devoir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pC evoir ûtes/ devoir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pC evoir urent/ devoir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pC evoir evrai/ devoir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pC evoir evras/ devoir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evra/ devoir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evrons/ devoir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evrez/ devoir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evront/ devoir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pC evoir evrais/ devoir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evrait/ devoir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evrions/ devoir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evriez/ devoir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evraient/ devoir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX pC evoir oive/ devoir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pC evoir oives/ devoir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX pC evoir usse/ devoir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX pC evoir ussé/ devoir # po:simp po:1isg
SFX pC evoir ussè/ devoir # po:simp po:1isg
SFX pC evoir usses/ devoir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX pC evoir ût/ devoir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX pC evoir ussions/ devoir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX pC evoir ussiez/ devoir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX pC evoir ussent/ devoir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX pC evoir ois/ devoir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evons/ devoir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evez/ devoir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX pD Y 1
SFX pD evoir û devoir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
