st.dic
devoir/pCpD  # po:v3__tnq__a
pouvoir/pA  # po:v3_it_xx_a
redevoir/pC  # po:v3__t____a
revouloir/pB  # po:v3__tne__a
vouloir/pB  # po:v3_itne__a
